oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX S N 164
SFX S o ista o
SFX S o istaj o
SFX S o istajn o
SFX S o istan o
SFX S o iste o
SFX S o ist’ o
SFX S o ist' o
SFX S o isto o
SFX S o istoj o
SFX S o istojn o
SFX S o iston o
SFX S o istina o
SFX S o istinaj o
SFX S o istinajn o
SFX S o istinan o
SFX S o istine o
SFX S o istin’ o
SFX S o istin' o
SFX S o istino o
SFX S o istinoj o
SFX S o istinojn o
SFX S o istinon o
SFX S a ista a
SFX S a istaj a
SFX S a istajn a
SFX S a istan a
SFX S a iste a
SFX S a ist’ a
SFX S a ist' a
SFX S a isto a
SFX S a istoj a
SFX S a istojn a
SFX S a iston a
SFX S a istina a
SFX S a istinaj a
SFX S a istinajn a
SFX S a istinan a
SFX S a istine a
SFX S a istin’ a
SFX S a istin' a
SFX S a istino a
SFX S a istinoj a
SFX S a istinojn a
SFX S a istinon a
SFX S on ista on
SFX S on istaj on
SFX S on istajn on
SFX S on istan on
SFX S on iste on
SFX S on ist’ on
SFX S on ist' on
SFX S on isto on
SFX S on istoj on
SFX S on istojn on
SFX S on iston on
SFX S on istina on
SFX S on istinaj on
SFX S on istinajn on
SFX S on istinan on
SFX S on istine on
SFX S on istin’ on
SFX S on istin' on
SFX S on istino on
SFX S on istinoj on
SFX S on istinojn on
SFX S on istinon on
SFX S 0 sta i
SFX S 0 staj i
SFX S 0 stajn i
SFX S 0 stan i
SFX S 0 ste i
SFX S 0 st’ i
SFX S 0 st' i
SFX S 0 sto i
SFX S 0 stoj i
SFX S 0 stojn i
SFX S 0 ston i
SFX S 0 stina i
SFX S 0 stinaj i
SFX S 0 stinajn i
SFX S 0 stinan i
SFX S 0 stine i
SFX S 0 stin’ i
SFX S 0 stin' i
SFX S 0 stino i
SFX S 0 stinoj i
SFX S 0 stinojn i
SFX S 0 stinon i
SFX S me ta isme
SFX S me taj isme
SFX S me tajn isme
SFX S me tan isme
SFX S me te isme
SFX S me t’ isme
SFX S me t' isme
SFX S me to isme
SFX S me toj isme
SFX S me tojn isme
SFX S me ton isme
SFX S me tina isme
SFX S me tinaj isme
SFX S me tinajn isme
SFX S me tinan isme
SFX S me tine isme
SFX S me tin’ isme
SFX S me tin' isme
SFX S me tino isme
SFX S me tinoj isme
SFX S me tinojn isme
SFX S me tinon isme
SFX S e a isme
SFX S e aj isme
SFX S e ajn isme
SFX S e an isme
SFX S e ’ isme
SFX S e ' isme
SFX S e o isme
SFX S e oj isme
SFX S e ojn isme
SFX S e on isme
SFX S e iista [^m]e
SFX S e iistaj [^m]e
SFX S e iistajn [^m]e
SFX S e iistan [^m]e
SFX S e iiste [^m]e
SFX S e iist’ [^m]e
SFX S e iist' [^m]e
SFX S e iisto [^m]e
SFX S e iistoj [^m]e
SFX S e iistojn [^m]e
SFX S e iiston [^m]e
SFX S e iistina [^m]e
SFX S e iistinaj [^m]e
SFX S e iistinajn [^m]e
SFX S e iistinan [^m]e
SFX S e iistine [^m]e
SFX S e iistin’ [^m]e
SFX S e iistin' [^m]e
SFX S e iistino [^m]e
SFX S e iistinoj [^m]e
SFX S e iistinojn [^m]e
SFX S e iistinon [^m]e
SFX S e iista nome
SFX S e iistaj nome
SFX S e iistajn nome
SFX S e iistan nome
SFX S e iiste nome
SFX S e iist’ nome
SFX S e iist' nome
SFX S e iisto nome
SFX S e iistoj nome
SFX S e iistojn nome
SFX S e iiston nome
SFX S e iistina nome
SFX S e iistinaj nome
SFX S e iistinajn nome
SFX S e iistinan nome
SFX S e iistine nome
SFX S e iistin’ nome
SFX S e iistin' nome
SFX S e iistino nome
SFX S e iistinoj nome
SFX S e iistinojn nome
SFX S e iistinon nome
