oo/vimspell/eo.dic
aboli/ABOST
aĉeto/JS
adventa/AS
afiŝi/AJOSTB
agrikulturo/AOS
agronome/FIS
akrigi/AfSTB
akustiko/AOS
alĥemio/ASOY
altruisme/S
ama/SY
anabaptisme/S
anestezi/LSTY
antagonisme/S
antropomorfa/AOSZ
apologii/AOSVB
araba/ACFGSY
arĥivo/AOS
arka/ASOCGY
arkeologe/FIS
arkpafi/AOST
artifiki/BCOUSTY
arto/AOSY
asigni/AOST
astrodiveni/ASV
astronome/FIS
atisme/SU
atomo/OSZ
aŭkcii/AOST
aŭtomobilo/AeOSZ
aventuri/ABOSUVZ
azena/FGSY
balai/DfLlSTY
baleta/AOS
banka/AOSZ
barbo/AeOS
baskulkamiono/AOS
bazara/SU
beligi/STBY
bestobredo/AOS
bibliografe/FIS
biblisciencon/ASX
bileto/AHJOS
bindi/ALORSTY
bioĥemio/AOS
biologe/FIS
bizanciismo/AOS
blogo/AOSUY
bobeni/LS
bolŝevisme/S
bordela/ASO
bota/AOS
botpurigi/ASV
brankardo/AOS
brigado/AOS
brodi/STY
broki/AOSTY
brutkomerci/ASV
buĉi/ABJOST
budhisme/S
bulko/AeOS
butiki/ASOV
ĉantaĝi/ABOTS
ĉapela/AJOSY
ĉarfari/ASV
ĉasi/BJSOTY
censi/AOST
ceramiko/ASO
ĉerko/AHOS
ĉifono/AKGOQSUY
cimbalo/AOS
cirko/AOS
civila/ACSU
ĉokolado/AHOS
darvinisme/S
decembro/OS
demografe/FIS
demonstri/ABOTSY
denunci/STBO
detali/BOQSTY
diagnozi/AOST
dialogo/AHSOUVY
dieto/AOSU
diplomi/AOST
distili/SOLQTJY
dogana/AJOS
domkovri/ASV
dramo/ACGOS
dresi/ST
duala/ACOSZ
egali/ACMOQSUTYZ
egoo/ASOZ
ekspedi/AJOST
eksponi/AJOSTY
ekumeno/ASOZ
ekzegezi/AOTS
ekzorci/ATSY
elektri/ASCGJOTZ
elektroteĥniko/AOS
emajli/ASOT
empirio/AOSUZ
enciklopedia/ACSO
enketi/ALOSVB
ensemblo/AOSW
entomologe/FIS
epigrafika/AOS
epigramo/AOS
eseo/AKOS
esperanto/FGQSWY
esplori/ADJSOTY
etika/ASO
etiologe/FIS
etnologe/FIS
eŭropocentra/ASZ
evangelio/AOSZ
fadeno/eKSO
fako/CeKOSU
falango/AJOS
falka/AOS
fanfaroni/ASUVBY
farmacia/AJSO
farmi/AGOSUT
faŝisme/S
federacii/AOSTUZ
fela/ASO
feminisme/S
feraĵa/S
fervojo/AOS_^
fi-gazeto/ASO
filmi/DST
finala/ASO
fiŝi/ACJHOSVY
fizika/ASO
flegi/AFOST
florvendi/ASV
foira/AJOS
fonetiko/OS
forĝi/STJ
fornosidi/ASV
foti/ALOSTY
frazi/KSVY
fromaĝo/AJOS
frukto/AeHJOSY
fundamenti/OSTYZ
fungologe/FIS
fuŝi/ABCOQSTUY
fuŝtraduki/AOST
futurisme/SY
gajiga/LS
garaĝi/AOTS
ĝardeni/ASOT
gastlabori/ASV
gema/ASO
genetiko/AOS
geofizika/AOS
geologe/FIS
ginekologe/FIS
gitari/ASVO
glavfari/ASV
gondola/ASO
gramatiko/eOS
gravuri/LOSY
grimpi/SUV
guverni/ST
gvidi/ASOLT
harmonika/AOS
haŭto/AeOS
hejmmastrumi/AOVS
heleno/FSZ
ĥemio/OSY
higiena/ASO
hilozoisme/AOS
histologe/FIS
hobojo/AOS
homrabi/SV
hortikulturo/AJOS
humanisme/S
humuro/OSY
ikonrompisme/S
ilumini/SQTYZ
iluzii/ASOQTU
imperii/AOSVZ
imposto/JS
imunologe/FIS
individuo/GOSZ
infano/ACKJOQSYZ
instali/LMS
integra/AGOQSV
internacia/CAGQSUYZ
intervjui/AOTS
inventi/ABOSTY
islama/AGOQSWYZ
jaĥto/AOS
ĵongli/SVY
ĵudo/AOS
juvelo/AKHJSOY
kablo/ASO
kaleŝa/AJOS
kaligrafe/FIS
kalvina/ASWZ
kamelpeli/ASV
kamentubo/AOS
kamerao/AOS
kamplaboro/AOS
kandela/ASO
kantino/AOS
kapti/ABOLRQSTY
karakterologio/AOS
karieradi/SBVZ
karoserio/AOS
kasa/AJOS
kateĥisme/S
kazuo/AOS
kemio/AOSY
klaĉi/ABSOVU
klarneto/AOS
kleriga/JS
klinika/ASO
kluba/ASWOJ
koka/JSY
kolektiva/ASOZ
kolorigi/ST
kolporti/ST
komedii/ASOV
komerci/SOVJY
komikso/AOS
komposti/ALSTYy
komputiko/AOS
komunuma/AOS
kondukon/SX
konstruentrepreni/AOSV
konta/AOSU
kontoro/AOS
kontraŭislama/ASZ
kooperativo/AOSW
korespondi/AFOSVY
korto/AOS[
kraniologe/FIS
kriminala/AGS
kroniki/ASOT
kronometri/AOST
kubi/ASGOVZ
kulturologie/FIS
kuri/AGJOSV
lada/ASOY
lakti/ACSOVJY
lanca/ASO
laringologe/FIS
laŭvorta/ASYZ
legitimi/LSTYZ
legomvendi/ASV
leksikologe/FIS
leterporti/AVS
libro/ACeJKOS
lifto/AOS
likvidi/ASTY
limonado/ASO
lingvoscienca/AOS
liro/AOSZ
literaturhistorio/AOS
literaturscienca/AOSY
logiko/OSUy
lombardi/JST
magio/AOSY
malĉasti/ABCGJQSUVY
manlaboro/AOS
marksisme/S
maro/SO
masoni/STY
mastrumi/ASVY
materia/ACGOQSYZ
matraca/ASO
maŭisme/S
medicino/ACOSY
meĥanika/ASO
melki/ST
mensogi/AOSUV
mesaĝo/AOS
metalurgio/AOS
meteorologie/FIS
metodo/AKSOZ
metrologe/FIS
mikrobiologe/FIS
milito/OSYZ
miniaturi/AOSGT
miraklo/AOS
mitologe/FIS
mitraleto/AOS
moda/AOQSVYx
monarĥo/FSZ
monfalsi/ASV
moralo/OSZ
morpentra/ASY
mueli/AJLST
muskedo/AOS
nacisocialisme/S
naturo/OS
navigacia/AOS
nefaka/ASU
negro/CFS
nervologe/FIS
nihilisme/S
nominala/AOSZ
nutri/AFOSTY
ofici/ACJOSV
oftalmologe/FIS?
okulkuraca/AS
operaciesplora/AOS
optika/ASO
organizo/OSY
orlavi/ASV
ornitologe/FIS
paca/ASGOQVZ
pafi/JLSY
paki/AMOQSTY
paleontologe/FIS
panbutiko/AOS
panteisme/S
papa/CSZ
parolstrukturo/SO
paŝti/JQST
patologo-anatomia/AOS
pedikuri/AOST
pelta/AOSY
pentri/ADJSY
pesimisme/S
piano/ASOV
pikmurdi/AOTS
plani/ALOSTZ
plori/ABDGS
plumbi/ASOTYZ
polico/AJOSW
politiki/AOSVY
pordo/AceOS[
porti/LOQSY
poŝŝteli/SV
poto/AKSO
pozitivo/OSZ
praktiko/SO
prediki/ASOT
prezento/QS
proceduri/ABSOV
profesio/OSU
programi/KLST
projekti/AOST
propagandi/ASOLT
protezi/AOST
prozo/ASOY
psiĥanalizo/AOS
psikanaliza/AOS
publici/VS
punkti/AOTSZ
purigi/AFLlMORSTX
puta/ASO
racio/CGMOSUYZ
rakonti/AORST
raso/OSWZ
razi/LST
reartikigi/TS
redakto/AeJOSY
reformi/OSTZ
registra/JSY
rekrutekzameno/AOS
rekrutinstrui/ASV
religiscienco/AOS
respublika/ASOW
reŭmatologe/FIS
revolucii/ASOUTZ
rikolti/SLT
rokmuziko/AOS
romantika/AOSUZ
rubriko/AOS
sadisme/S
ŝafo/KFJSY
ŝamano/FSYZ
sanitara/AJS
satana/ASZ
savo/AOQS
sciencesplora/AOS
segi/ASLTJY
sekvataga/ASUZ
seli/OST
semiotiko/AOS
serpentologe/FIS
servi/ABFOSVy
signoklarigi/AOST
ŝilda/AOS
simboli/ACKSGOTZ
sindikata/ASOWZ
ŝipkonstrua/AOS
sismologe/IS
skeĉa/AOS
skermi/AJOSV
sketi/AVS
skribi/JLSY
ŝmiri/ALSOTYz
ŝnuri/KST
sociologe/FIS
soneta/ASO
sorĉo/AOSUY
spacvojaĝi/AOSV
speciala/CEGMOQSY
speleologe/FIS
ŝpini/ASLQTJY
spiritualisme/S
ŝpruckamiono/AOS
stala/AOSV
stani/AOST
statistiki/ASOTY
stebi/SOLT
stenografi/ASTY
stivi/ST
ŝtontajli/ASV
ŝua/AOSY
subjektiva/ACSOZ
sukeraĵo/AJOS
surealisme/S
tabaka/AJOSHZ
tajli/AOSTv
taksio/AOS
taktiko/ASO
tamburi/ASOV
taoisme/S?
taŭro/AOS
teĥnika/CESY
teknika/CESY
telefoni/AOSTY
telematiko/AOSY
telemetri/AOTS
teologe/FIS
terapia/AOS
terminaro/S
terminografe/FIS
terora/AOSVZ
tinkturi/AJOST
tipografe/FIS
tombo/JOS
torei/AOSV
tradicio/BCOSUWYZ
traduki/FGLOQRSTYy
tragedia/ASO
traktoro/AOS
tramvoja/AOS
transpasigi/AOST
trejni/QTS
trumpeto/AOS
turisme/S
unudia/ASZ
urboplanisme/S
utili/GMSVZ
uzuri/AOSV
varti/AJOST
ventroparoli/AS
verki/BKLTSY
versi/CSV
veturigi/S
vikipedia/AS
vino/ACJOS
vitri/ASOCGTY
vojaĝa/AOS
voki/AajLlORST
vortaro/AeOS
zoologe/FIS
